Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 4. Stepparent and Confirmatory Adoption.

§ 63.2-1241.
Adoption of child by spouse of birth or adoptive parent or other person with legitimate interest.

In cases in which the spouse of a birth parent or parent by adoption or a person with a legitimate interest who is not the birth parent of a child wishes to adopt the child, the birth parent or parent by adoption and such parent’s spouse or other person with a legitimate interest may file a petition for adoption in the circuit court of the county or city where the birth parent or parent by adoption and such parent’s spouse or other person with a legitimate interest reside or the county or city where the child resides. The petition shall be the joint petition of the birth parent or parent by adoption and such parent’s spouse or other person with a legitimate interest, but the birth parent or parent by adoption shall unite in the petition for the purpose of indicating consent to the prayer thereof only. The petition shall also state whether the petitioners seek to change the name of the child.

The court may order the proposed adoption and change of name without referring the matter to the local director if (i) the birth parent or parent by adoption, other than the birth parent or parent by adoption joining in the petition for adoption, is deceased; (ii) the birth parent or parent by adoption, other than the birth parent or parent by adoption joining in the petition for adoption, consents to the adoption in writing and under oath; (iii) the acknowledged, adjudicated, presumed, or putative father denies paternity of the child; (iv) the birth mother swears under oath and in writing that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable; (v) the child is the result of surrogacy and the birth parent, other than the birth parent joining in the petition, consents to the adoption in writing; (vi) the parent by adoption joining in the petition was not married at the time the child was adopted; or (vii) the child is 14 years of age or older and has lived in the home of the person desiring to adopt the child for at least five years. However, if the court in its discretion determines that there should be an investigation before a final order of adoption is entered, the court shall refer the matter to the local director for an investigation and report to be completed within such time as the circuit court designates. If an investigation is ordered, the circuit court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto to the local director and the provisions of §

63.2-1208

shall apply.

If an acknowledged, adjudicated, presumed, or putative birth parent or parent by adoption of a child refuses to consent to the adoption of a child by the spouse of the other birth parent or parent by adoption of the child or other person with a legitimate interest, the court shall determine whether consent to the adoption is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child. If the court determines that consent to the adoption is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, the court may order the adoption and change of name without referring the matter to the local director. However, if the court in its discretion determines that there should be an investigation before a final order of adoption is entered, the circuit court shall refer the matter to the local director for an investigation and report to be completed within such time as the circuit court designates. The order of reference may include a requirement that the local director investigate factors relevant to determining whether consent of a birth parent is withheld contrary to the best interests of the child, including factors set forth in §

63.2-1205

. If an investigation is ordered, the circuit court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto to the local director and the provisions of §

63.2-1208

shall apply.

In any case involving adoption of a child by a stepparent or other person with a legitimate interest pursuant to this section, the court may waive appointment of a guardian ad litem for the child.

In cases in which both petitioners are listed as the child’s parents on the child’s birth certificate, the court shall permit the petitioners to obtain an adoption order under this section in order to secure the child’s legal parentage.

For the purposes of this section, “person with a legitimate interest” means the same as that term is defined in §

20-124.1

.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-356.1; 1950, p. 626; 1956, c. 300; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-231; 1974, c. 421; 1975, c. 364; 1977, c. 526; 1979, c. 339; 1986, cc. 481, 482; 1987, c. 482; 1992, c. 607; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.48; 2002, c. 747; 2006, cc. 825, 848; 2007, cc. 606, 623; 2010, c. 306; 2012, c. 424; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 252; 2022, c. 377.

Cross references.

As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall be enacted July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.”
The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 252, inserted “and Confirmatory” in the article 4 heading, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 825 and 848 inserted “or if the child is the result of surrogacy” in subsection B; and in subsection C, added clauses (v) and (vi) in the introductory paragraph and subdivisions a. through c. Acts 2006, c. 825 also added a subdivision C d, effective July 1, 2007. Acts 2006, c. 848 is effective July 1, 2006.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 606 and 623 are identical, and rewrote subdivision C d, which read: “Is not a putative father who has registered with the Putative Father Registry pursuant to Article 9 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of this chapter and the putative father’s identity is not reasonably ascertainable.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 306 added subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 424 rewrote the section.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 252, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “or a person with a legitimate interest” in five places and substituted “such parent’s spouse or other person with a legitimate interest” for “his spouse” in three places; in subsections C and D, inserted “or other person with a legitimate interest”; and added subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 377 added subsection E and redesignated accordingly.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 63.2-1242.
Investigation and report at discretion of circuit court.

For adoptions under this article, an investigation and report shall be undertaken only if the circuit court in its discretion determines that there should be an investigation before a final order of adoption is entered. If the circuit court makes such a determination, it shall refer the matter to the local director for an investigation and report to be completed within such time as the circuit court designates. If an investigation is ordered, the circuit court shall forward a copy of the petition and all exhibits thereto to the local director and the provisions of §

63.2-1208

shall apply.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-356.1; 1950, p. 626; 1956, c. 300; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-231; 1974, c. 421; 1975, c. 364; 1977, c. 526; 1979, c. 339; 1986, cc. 481, 482; 1987, c. 482; 1992, c. 607; 1995, cc. 772, 826; 2000, c. 830, § 63.1-219.49; 2002, c. 747; 2018, c. 9.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 9, cl. 2 provided: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2020.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 9, expired July 1, 2020, and inserted the second sentence and substituted “determines that an investigation and report should be required” for “makes such a determination” in the third sentence.